# Chapter 4: The Eight Gates

After Laplace left, Diablo was the only one left in the room. He smiled and was glad that everything had gone as planned.

He watched the battle of his beloved Lord up close and was planning to use it as a reference for his own future usefulness.

He was truly grateful for the opportunity to look into whatever his Lord lacked and figure out how he could make up for it.

*No, rather, there is nothing that can be lacking in Rimuru-sama. What is important here is to find out how I can best take action in the future.*

No matter how his mind wandered, Diablo would only think about how he could be useful to Rimuru.

And the other reason he hadn't entered the war was because of another intention.

*If I participate in the war, I will not struggle against anyone but Velgrynd-sama. That would be a waste, wouldn't it?*

The rare opportunity to fight a strong opponent should be used effectively.

In Diablo's view, Benimaru was showing signs of growth. He had greatly increased his strength through evolution, and the shortest way to hone that strength was to fight strong opponents.

This was not only the case for Benimaru, but for all the executives who had been given power by Rimuru.

And on this battlefield, just the right opponents were waiting. Diablo thought that there was no reason to not take advantage of this.

*Well, it seems that Benimaru-dono also saw through my thoughts, but judging from the fact that he didn't complain, I guess he was planning to do this from the beginning.*

Benimaru, despite his appearance, was surprisingly belligerent. He tended to enjoy fighting with the strong, though not as much as Diablo.

'I look forward to seeing him grow,' Diablo thought.

If he survived this battle, he would gain more power.

But more importantly---

*Rimuru-sama's orders are absolute. No one is allowed to die, so there is no choice but to win.*

They had to make sure that no one died and that they survived to be reborn stronger. For that purpose, Diablo had no intention to spare any cooperation.

Power that was given to you was meaningless. It would only shine if it was acquired and mastered by oneself.

This would be the stage for that transformation.

Give them an enemy and crush them. The growth that lied ahead was what Rimuru desired---that's what Diablo thought.

*Kufufufufu. Aside from Testarossa, even Carrera and Ultima have been seen to be fighting with too much force. In particular, Carrera is a problem. It would be a good experience to learn what it is like to struggle in a fight here. Make sure you survive. If you don't, I really will kill you. Kufufufufufufu---*

Diablo thought about this and laughed even more happily.

His excitement reached its peak as he witnessed the battle between Rimuru and Velgrynd.


![soft scene break]


On the outer deck of the Emperor's flagship, the Imperial Knights were gathered together.

The presence of Velgrynd, the protector of the Empire, fueled their fighting spirit.

"With Velgrynd-sama here, our victory is assured."

"Yes, we can't afford to lose."

"Let's win here and conquer the Western Nations at once."

"That's right. The day when our empire unites the whole world is near."

"Long live His Majesty the Emperor, hurrah!!"

"Glory to His Majesty the Emperor!!"

On the deck, which was not a very large space, they expressed their feelings to each other.

Then, all at once, they fixed their eyes on the enemy.

"So, you've arrived. The Demon lord's subordinates."

"Your defeat was already decided once the evil dragon Veldora was taken from you!"

Some of them mocked the enemy, but most of them fell silent and drew their swords.

The reason was simple and obvious. The people coming towards them were recognized as a real "threat." They prepared themselves for a decisive battle and moved to intercept them. However, they just didn't know it yet. They had no idea that despair was just around the corner. And once they realized it, their lives would be over.

![break]

Testarossa flew gracefully through the air, a sorrowful expression on her face, as if she were not amused. She had witnessed the people who were her targets foolishly holding their swords on the airship.

"I don't like it. They're too stupid to challenge us as soon as they see us."

Benimaru remained silent.

He would have agreed with her, but he thought it was still natural to do so from the enemy's standpoint. That is why he kept silent without agreeing to Testarossa's statement.

This was also why Benimaru was still considered within the realms of a sensible^['Sensible' as in within the realms of someone with 'common sense' or considered to be somewhat 'normal.'] person.

There were those who were truly outrageous and abnormal in their thought processes. As if to prove this, Testarossa took action.

"It is foolish to misjudge the strong. It is so pathetic, so let us give them the blessing of mercy without fear!"

In truth, Testarossa had intended to go on a bit of a rampage, show off her skills, and feed off of the emotions of those who feared her.

However, it would take a long time to terrify someone who was already prepared. That would have been troublesome and, more than anything, would have deviated from the purpose of the mission.

Therefore, she decided to eliminate the obstacles swiftly.

Without hesitation, Testarossa unleashed a spell that would cover the entire airship.

The spell was nuclear magic: 'Death Streak.'

The ultimate forbidden magic, which destroyed the soul, unleashed its ruthless fury. As a result, a jet-black sphere was formed so as to envelop the entire airship, bringing death to those inside.

![break]

Almost everyone inside the ship was killed from the demonic death rays that killed all life forms.

Even Major General Zamud, who had finished contacting Gladium and was busy preparing for the battle, died before even understanding what had happened.

He had no luck.

If Rimuru could have afforded it, he would have remembered Calgurio's plea for life and instructed her not to involve Zamud and the others.

But alas, reality was cruel, and all beings were equal in the face of death.

"So sudden. I ordered a preemptive strike, but I guess they're out of their depth here."

"I've been trying very hard so that you don't have to bother."

"Nonsense. Rather, you're thinking, 'in order not to have your prey taken away', right?"

Testarossa laughed in amusement at Benimaru's remark.

"Oh, so you've seen through me, haven't you? That's Benimaru-sama for you."

"It's been a long time since I was not happy about a compliment."

Even though they were bantering, there were no problems. In fact, Benimaru was glad she had saved them from the trouble.

It was the two late comers who complained.

"Ahh! I wished you had left some for us!"

"I made a bad choice. I should have just left Diablo alone and given priority to this."

Ultima and Carrera stared at Testarossa bitterly.

Testarossa simply returned a wry smile.

"You both are not ready for this. Look around you carefully for signs. There are some who survived still out there."

"That's right! Anyone who can be killed by an attack like that is not good enough for me. Rather, I should praise you for selecting them well!"

"You flatter me, Shion-dono."

Testarossa smiled, knowing exactly what was meant.

The expression on her face eloquently told them that those who were aware could understand.

Only the magically suitable or spiritual life forms could withstand the 'Death Streak'. With a bit of luck, even a "sage" class would be able to survive.

Regardless, if anyone was still alive on the ship, it was safe to assume that they were strong.

Ultima and Carrera were frustrated, but it was not their place to complain. Realizing that, they decided to back off sincerely.

And then---

"Let's go."

At Benimaru's command, the raid operation began.


![soft scene break]


What the group saw once they landed on the deck of the flying ship were the dead and dying Imperial Knights of the Empire. The fact that their bodies were still intact was evidence of their desperate resistance.

This was the end of the line for those who would even be called champions in a great nation.

"No, I don't want to... I don't want to die..."

There were those who reached for the sky as if clinging to life.

But their lifespans were as good as expired. No remedy or restoration magic could help them.

Their fate had been sealed the moment they became Testarossa's enemy.

"Jeez! I still think it's a waste. If they were of such high quality, they could have sung a sweet hymn^[Basically, she's saying that their deaths could have made a lovely tune.]."

"Don't be so selfish. Look, they are here to welcome us."

Testarossa pointed to the bow of the flagship.

Located there were those who were at the top of the Empire.

Emperor Rudra and Velgrynd, who was still sleeping.

Flanking them, were Kondou and Damrada.

Behind Rudra, there were four other men and women.

There was also another quiet-looking man who was standing next to Kondou.

"It is an honor to be greeted by the Emperor himself."

When Benimaru spoke in a fearless manner, Kondou and Damrada---not Rudra, tried to step forward. But Rudra stopped them with one hand.

"It's fine. I will admit it. These are the only pawns I have left after more than 2,000 years of work. On behalf of the Demon Lord Rimuru, I will at least allow you a straight answer."

"Thank you for that."

"So then, what is the purpose of you coming here?"

"Oh, well that's a simple story. Although I do not have the full authority, I will make demands on Rimuru-sama's behalf. From this moment on, cease all fighting and surrender unconditionally. If you accept, we will stop our pursuit."

"And if I refuse?"

"Then I have been ordered by Rimuru-sama to annihilate you. Until one side is completely destroyed, it will be a full-on battle."

'We're not allowed to die though'---Benimaru added inwardly.

His voice never faltered, and Benimaru's attitude was one of arrogance. It was no wonder that the Imperials were embarrassed.

"How insolent!"

Marco shouted, as if it was unintentional.

"The arrogance of an ignorant maggot who knows nothing of the world. You are a fool."

One of the four knights carrying a spear muttered to Benimaru as if looking down on him. This naturally reached Benimaru's ears, but he kept his gaze fixed on Rudra, as if he had no intention of dealing with them.

The others remained silent.

Rudra was the one who had the right to make the decision, and since Rudra had allowed him to answer directly, they thought it would be impolite for them to interfere.

"That's ridiculous. My ambition will not end here."

"If so, then die."

Benimaru was now more thoughtful and less temperamental, but his true nature was that of a raging divine oni. He preferred to use force rather than to engage in long negotiations.

Besides---

There was no reason for him to retreat now that Rimuru had ordered him to kill all of his enemies.

Then there was a flashpoint.

In the midst of this atmosphere, there was one person who made a move. Velgrynd, who had been asleep, opened her eyes and jumped up.

"Rudra!"

"What's wrong? What is happening that has made even you so upset?"

Velgrynd took a glance around her and realized what was going on here. Still, she decided that her business was more important and began to speak, ignoring Benimaru and the others.

"My 'Split Body' has been captured by Demon Lord Rimuru. It's going to take me a few minutes to break the barriers, so I decided to bring my power back here first---"

It was at this very moment---Rimuru had sealed Velgrynd in his 'Insulation Prison'.

Velgrynd had thought that there was still plenty of room for leeway, but she felt threatened by the presence of the three demon girls in addition to Benimaru and the others.

"That's Rimuru-sama for you! We can't afford to lose to them either."

Shion was pleased and excited.

"He seems to be concentrating on Veldora-sama right now. Rimuru-sama will surely bring Veldora-sama back."

Souei also nodded.

He had quietly left a 'Clone' to confirm Rimuru's safety. That was just the type of man Souei was.

"He's able to fight against Velgrynd-sama and Veldora-sama at the same time, and still be more than evenly matched. How impressive."

"He really is. Honestly, I didn't expect him to be this strong either."

"That's right. Milord is truly unfathomable."

Having been aware of Velgrynd's strength, the three demon girls took that statement to heart. To be honest, the three of them were still filled with disbelief.

"It was a big mistake. We should not have been fooled by Diablo's sweet words."

"That's true. He knew this was going to happen, so he just wanted to observe. That's not fair."

To a demon, cowardice was also a compliment, but Shion heard this and decided to pursue Diablo on this later.

Souei, who was also observing, remained calm.

And Benimaru was quietly looking away. This was because he had used Moss to watch Rimuru's fight.

Meanwhile, the Imperials were in turmoil.

"No way! He has that much power?!"

Emperor Rudra, who was normally a calm and collected man who never showed his emotions, could not help but stand up and shout.

He had heeded Kondou's advice and highly evaluated Rimuru. However, there was no doubt that he had underestimated Rimuru, thinking that he would not be as much of a threat as Veldora.

Even if he realized it now, it was still too late.

Kondou also realized that he had made a mistake.

He had felt wary when his attack had failed, but that had not been enough.

*No matter what happens, I will protect His Majesty.*

Without saying a word, he made up his mind.

From the beginning, Damrada had believed that Demon Lord Rimuru was a threat.

It was not a matter of logic.

A man as cunning as Yuuki, even with all his scheming, was unable to take advantage of him. That alone made him a dangerous opponent that could not be left alone.

There was something different about Demon Lord Rimuru.

Yuuki was the same, and so was Demon Lord Rimuru.

Those who wore a kind of supreme energy that could be called charisma. They were the ones who fascinated Damrada, and the ones who gave him a sense of mysterious possibility.

Damrada had a distant promise made to Emperor Rudra. Damrada did not know if he should keep it or not.

That is why Damrada entrusted his fate to others instead of himself.

Those who were worthy of being entrusted with it---those who had something in them that made him think that way were shining beings like Yuuki and Rimuru.

The Demon Lord Rimuru, who was one of those existences, was enraged to the point of blowing away his reason.

That fact made Damrada feel uneasy.

He had a feeling something was going to happen.

As Rudra had said, the best of the Empire's forces were assembled on the bridge. Gladium and his men were nowhere to be seen, but the reality was that no more reinforcements could be expected.

And yet, they were unable to overwhelm Demon Lord Rimuru's subordinates.

In the first place, Demon Lord Rimuru was not an opponent to be taken lightly. This was evident from the current situation.

Damrada kept his guard up and tensed all his nerves so that he could immediately protect the Emperor no matter what happened.

The other four knights and Marco were also having a hard time keeping their composure due to the unexpected situation.

The power of an Absolute such as Velgrynd was unfathomable, even for someone as powerful as them. Such a Velgrynd had recognized the power of Demon Lord Rimuru. It was impossible not to be confused.

![break]

At this time, both sides were astonished in opposite ways, but it was Velgrynd who broke that atmosphere.

"You said it would be a full-on battle, correct? All right. I will defeat you and use you as bargaining chips for the Demon Lord Rimuru. Is that okay?"

"Very well. Prove your power to me!"

"Understood!!"

As soon as Rudra made his decision, the agitation of the Imperial Knights disappeared. His voice was full of strength and it brought peace to the hearts of the warriors.

"Yes, I promise you victory."

Velgrynd also spoke with a fierce smile on her face.

The beautiful yet terrifying smile on her face foreshadowed the horrors of the battle to come.

"You're okay with that, too?"

"Yes. We will win this battle and put an end to any future disasters."

"Okay. Then have a good fight---"

As soon as she said that, Velgrynd opened her hands and held them up to the sky.

Then she invoked the 'Eight Gate Formation.' Eight gates appeared in the sky, lining up in the center of the two camps.

In front of the gates, which had shrunk to the size of a man's body, Velgrynd explained.

"On this flagship, I have isolated us in an alternate universe I've created. If you want to escape, you will have to destroy all of these gates."

There were eight Imperials here, not including Rudra. That meant that each of them would be guarding one gate.

"What happens if we all enter one gate?"

"That's an interesting question. You can try it, but once inside the gate, only the person who killed the guardian of the gate will be eligible to enter the next gate."

If that was true, then if they all went in, only one of them would be left to challenge the next gate. Since they couldn't escape without destroying all the gates, that choice would be too risky of a gamble.

"I see. If you're going to do this, then it's only right that we all go in together when we challenge the last remaining gate, correct?"

"You're very clever. If you're going to challenge the gate I am guarding, then that is probably the right thing to do."

Velgrynd nodded with a smile at what Benimaru pointed out.

She must have seen that coming. Even so, she was confident that she would not be defeated, which was why she presented those conditions from the beginning.

"However, it is precisely because I have set such conditions that this otherworld can be maintained at low cost. You cannot escape without destroying all of the gates, and you cannot touch Rudra. Or would you prefer that we fight an all-out war here?"

Either way, Velgrynd proclaimed as such.

The defenders were at a disadvantage when guarding the Eight Gates. Since information about the guardians of the gates would be known, there was a risk that the enemy would take precautions against the challenge. But if it became an all-out battle, Rudra would be in danger. Velgrynd's true intention was to avoid just that.

She also wanted to capture Rimuru's subordinates in the otherworld. Velgrynd was willing to accept some disadvantages in order to bring the battle to an alternate space.

"All right. I'll accept that match."

Benimaru responded without hesitation.

Upon hearing this, Velgrynd was convinced of victory.

*Unless I lose, this otherworld will not be broken. In other words, our victory is unassailable.*

Velgrynd was confident that she would win even if they all challenged her at once. That is why she chose the safest strategy, the 'Eight Gate Formation.'

Benimaru, too, was aware of Velgrynd's intentions. However, even if he refused here, he would not be able to avoid a fight with Velgrynd, so he decided that it would be better to choose the option with the best chance of success.

In this place, the intentions of both parties coincided, and the location for the final battle was decided.


![soft scene break]


Before Benimaru's eyes, one by one, they disappeared into the gates.

At the last one remaining, Velgrynd went through the gate after embracing Rudra.

Immediately, the gates began to move slowly, surrounding Benimaru and his companions.

Being unaware of who had entered which gate---there was no such thing. Nobody would be so foolish as to overlook that.

"What a cowardly thing to do. Now we don't know who's guarding which gate."

It was Shion who said that.

"...It's fine. I remember."

*'You idiot, you didn't even look at it properly, right?'* Benimaru swallowed those words. He felt that he could understand Diablo's hardships a little.

"Fufu, what fun entertainment. If you are victorious, then you will have the honor of fighting me."

Rudra, protected by the laws of the otherworld, said this as he sat comfortably in his chair.

Rudra did not doubt Velgrynd's victory. It was clear from his demeanor that he thought of this battle only as mere entertainment.

"Is that what you think? You never know what will happen in a battle. I'll show you that there are some things we cannot compromise on."

Benimaru spoke boldly.

Then, he looked around at the faces of his companions.

He was trying to figure out who should go against whom.

However, there was one person who could not wait for Benimaru's decision.

It was Shion.

"I've been patiently enduring all this time, but that's enough."

"H-Hey?!"

"Rimuru-sama said to kill all the enemies. In that case, we don't need to worry and should just get rid of them!"

Leaving aside the question of whether or not she was feeling troubled, he couldn't allow her to do this without permission---Benimaru thought about this, but before he could stop Shion, she had kicked down the door and entered the gate.

"...It's fine. I don't know if it was by choice or by chance, but it looks like she picked the right person."

Shion's actions tended to lead to optimal results. Although there were problems this time, she chose the door that matched Benimaru's intentions.

Now, there were seven doors left.

One of them was Velgrynd's, which needed to be used last.

The question was who would be the right people to deal with whom?

"May I?"

It was Veyron who offered.

"What?"

It was Ultima who asked with a chilling presence in her voice.

"The truth is, I haven't finished my fight with Marco yet. I believe I can guarantee you victory now."

Defeating a beatable opponent was a standard practice.

It wasn't a bad idea to leave it to him, since he could leave if he won. Benimaru decided as such and gave his permission.

"All right. I'll leave Marco to you."

"Hm, that's fine. If Benimaru-san says so, I have no problem with it."

Ultima calmed her anger, and Veyron's partner was chosen.

Seeing the exchange, Agera was the next to speak.

"In that case, I have a favor to ask."

"It was Agera, correct? What is it?"

"Actually, there is someone whom I'm not so sure if I have a history with, although I'm not sure if I'll be a good match. If it's possible, I'd like to deal with him."

"Who is it?"

"A man named Kondou. It seems that he is a kindred spirit of mine, and as a pure swordsman, he is an opponent I cannot ignore."

"Oh? Really?"

It sounded like there was a connection, Benimaru thought.

He was curious about Agera's school of swordsmanship, and he knew that Hakurou was interested in Agera as well. In that case, he wanted to fulfill his wish, but there was a problem.

"Are you confident that you can win?"

That's right, if Agera lost, there would be no point.

In Benimaru's opinion, Lieutenant Kondou was a troublesome man. Even Rimuru had been wary of him, so he knew that Agera would have trouble beating him.

"That is..."

Agera stammered.

As a swordsman, he would have no regrets even if he lost. But that would be an act against Rimuru's will.

Agera also understood that his offer was selfish.

Then Agera received a helping hand.

"All right, Agera. It's unusual for you to be so selfish, so I'll help you."

It was Carrera.

As Agera's lord, she said this with dignity.

Benimaru nodded.

He did not ask Carrera if she could win.

"I don't know if you can beat this Kondou guy or not. I won't tell you not to lose, but you must not die."

Hearing this, Carrera smiled widely.

"Of course. And, yes, you're right. Let's give Agera a test. We need to see if winning will really open the next gate, and I think it's better to experiment on the weakest opponent anyway."

"Agreed! Shion-san's gone, but even if we win, it won't matter if we can't fight again."

"Right. If that's the case, we'll have to challenge Velgrynd-sama with only qualified players. Though, Velgrynd-sama is a proud person, so I don't think she's lying."

Naturally, Benimaru had considered this possibility. He had planned to have Shion try it when she returned, but if she wanted to try it with Agera, there was no reason to stop her.

"What is that plan?"

"We'll put Agera in the lead, with Esprit as a backup. That way we can find out if the next challenge is really only for those who have killed the enemy inside."

"And while you're at it, take Zonda. He's a healer, so he's useless against the strong opponents."

Zonda was not weak, but he was no match for a Saint-class opponent. Therefore, Ultima decided that it would not be a problem if he could not challenge again.

He didn't have to go to the dangerous battlefield and could just heal those who came out here. Because of this, there was no objection from anyone.

"In that case, Agera, Esprit, Zonda, the three of you, go attack this gate."

Benimaru pointed to the gate that one of the four knights had entered.

It was the big man with the spear on his back who had looked down on Benimaru and scorned him as a maggot.

Benimaru was tempted to turn him into charcoal with his own hands, but he decided to let Agera and the others do the job.

"Understood."

"Please leave it to me!"

"I promise you, we will return victorious."

And so, the three of them dove through the gate and went into battle.

![break]

And just like that, the attack on two of the gates began.

The rest of them remained calm, waiting for Benimaru to tell them who should attack where next.

"By the time Agera and the others return, we will decide who among each of us should attack."

The gate being guarded by Velgrynd would be postponed.

Kondou's opponent would be Carrera, and Marco's opponent would be Veyron.

That left Damrada and two of the four knights.

"From what I can tell, the man who appears to be the leader of those four knights seems to be the strongest. I think I'll deal with him."

"I have no objections. I had the same impression."

"In that case, can I take on that Damrada guy?"

![break]

"I've already chosen my opponent, so I have no complaints."

The strength of Damrada and the remaining four knights did not seem to differ that much. If so, there would be no complaints from Benimaru either.

"Souei, is that okay?"

"Yes. The only ones left are the four knights who use double swords. They seem to be a good match for me, so no problem."

"Then it's settled."

After saying that, Benimaru was silent for a while.

Then, embarrassed, he continued.

"...Even though it's all come to this, there's something troubling."

"What's wrong?"

Souei asked, to which Benimaru responded while scratching his cheek.

"We didn't share our names with each other, so I don't know their names. I remember who was guarding which gate, so it not much of problem."

"Indeed, that was a blind spot. Well, don't worry about it. Since it's going to be a battle anyway, it should be enough to know the name of the one we're going to kill."

Those who had been listening to the conversation between Benimaru and Souei nodded in agreement.

"Names" were important to monsters, but they were enemy's either way. The demons and others thought that there was no need to worry about it so much.


![soft scene break]


Agera, Esprit and Zonda went through the gate with great enthusiasm.

At the end of the gate, there was a circular colosseum-like structure, where a man was waiting for them.

"Oh my, did a whole school of small fry just arrive? I suppose it's only natural as they have come to deal with me."

Holding the spear on his back in his right hand, the man let out a vile laugh.

"Before you die, I'll tell you my name. I am Garcia-sama, the fifth in rank and one of the four knights who protect the Emperor! You demons, get a good taste of the honor of fighting me and disappear from this world!"

With that shout, Garcia swung his Legendary-grade spear, which was probably as close to mythical-grade as possible.

The power of the spear was so great that it could wipe out even a spiritual life form with just a graze.

However, Agera and the others kept a cool face.

"I have no interest in your name."

"This guy is an idiot. He called Benimaru-sama a maggot."

"It's because he doesn't know what he's capable of so that he can speak so brazenly. If it were me, I would be so embarrassed that I'd be in agony for three days."

Far from fearing Garcia, they all said whatever they wanted to say.

Garcia was furious.

"You're just a bunch of small fry who are good at pissing me off. You don't even know what I'm capable of, do you? In that case, I'll show you my true power!!"

After shouting, he released the power he had been holding back.

The amount of magicules in a saint-class individual was comparable to that of an awakened demon lord. Even though Agera and the others had evolved into demon peers, the difference was several times greater.

Clothed in a high density of fighting aura, Garcia took a step forward. With that, the marble floor of the colosseum cracked.

"Prepare yourself. You'll be sorry that you ever offended me."

Offended or not, Garcia's actions would have been the same either way. Everyone guessed as much, but no one said anything about it.

Agera put his hand on the sword at his waist and took a cautious approach to see how his opponent would react. Even a single blow would inevitably cause serious damage, so he decided to concentrate on defense.

Esprit was using Agera as a shield and was ready to attack with her magic.

The more Garcia concentrated on Agera, the more Esprit could prepare for a large spell. She seemed to be taking it easy, as if it was a good thing to be able to fight safely.

Zonda was focused on support. Not only was he good at restoration magic, but he also assisted Agera at key points.

It would be better to work with Zonda than Esprit---Agera began to secretly think as such.

Garcia scoffed at the demons' tactics.

They were on the defensive, and their only offense was their stupid magic. It was impossible to damage Garcia with such a fighting style.

That's why Garcia felt like he had already won and made many condescending remarks to his enemies.

"Hah! How cowardly. You may be demons, but you're still no match for us. We, as the strongest of knights, have subdued demons like you many times before! It is said that a demon peer is a legendary demon that rivals a demon lord... But that's just a story for a frog in the well. To us, you're nothing more than mere ants!"

As he said this, he slammed his spear into the ground, leaving a huge hole in the marble floor. Of course, Agera and Esprit avoided it without any trouble.

Agera never got outraged when being mocked. He had not forgotten that this fight was just a prelude to the real thing that was to come.

Esprit was more thorough. She was cautious in dealing with her opponent's attacks and hiding behind Agera to avoid taking any damage. Esprit had a Unique Skill, 'Discerner', which specialized in observation. In fact, by using this Skill, it was possible to keep in touch even with people who were separated by time and space.

Although there was a restriction that it was limited to personal acquaintances, the only person who could make use of this power was Carrera, so from Esprit's perspective, there were no issues. In fact, if Souei and the others had found out that Esprit possessed such an ability, she might have been forced to do espionage work.

Because Esprit hated working, she had to avoid that. That's why Esprit, as usual, continued to give information to Carrera, while providing appropriate support.

Incidentally, Zonda was evacuating to safe areas as soon as he finished providing support. He understood that he was not a fighter, so he was careful not to get injured as a healer.

Because of this, Garcia assumed that Agera and the others were running around for their lives.

They must be afraid of his own power and had no way to do anything about it.

"Hah! So that's it. You can't defeat me just by running away."

Garcia shouted at them while pulling out his spear.

His words were brash and rude, but his ability was undeniably real.

The spiritual power that pervaded his large physique was unparalleled even for a Saint.

He also possessed the Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative' granted to him by Emperor Rudra.

This enchantment was the power of 'subjugating and conquering', and it reduced the will of the enemy to defeat them with one's own power.

This power was also added to his favorite spear, transforming it into a holy spear of destruction, which could purify all kinds of evil---even spiritual life forms such as evil spirits and demons.

Needless to say, Garcia's body was being strengthened by the mere act of cursing his enemies. His body was protected by Legendary-grade armor, and he had no need to worry about the recoil of his own power.

Garcia had a deep understanding of his own powers.

While provoking his enemies in this way, he never let his guard down.

As Garcia had said himself, a demon peer was a legendary super-class demon, comparable to a demon lord. It was a threat of the highest order, not something to be taken lightly.

Even so, Garcia's provocation appeared to be meaningless to Agera.

Contempt for human existence was plentiful among the demon race, and if provoked they would immediately lash out. Garcia's rule of thumb was that this would create an opening and make it easier to defeat his opponent.

This time, however, that was not the case.

Garcia was irritated by the difficulty of this opponent.

"Calm down, human. Your language is vulgar. I don't believe all people to be vulgar, however...the soul has dignity too. If you have a lowly soul, there is nothing that can be done to hide it."

Garcia, who thought he was pretending to be crude, was furious when he was called vulgar. Unaware that this was Agera's own provocation, he lost his momentum and revealed his true nature.

Agera, without drawing his sword, continued to evade Garcia's attacks with minimal movement. This injured Garcia's pride even more.

Esprit, watching closely, was amazed at Agera's ability.

*This guy is so good at melee combat, how can he be a demon? He can't even use magic at all, isn't that stupid?*

While watching the battle, one would wonder whether she was praising or disparaging him.

Naturally, this was all being conveyed to Carrera in real time.

Garcia, incited by Agera, shouted.

"Shut up! I'll kill you all and offer your heads to His Majesty the Emperor!"

"Hmm, that's a bit hasty of you to say. I'm a rather tolerant person, but you are just too impatient. Well, not as impatient as Carrera-sama. She is so quick-tempered and simple-minded that she even gives me a hard time."

Of course, this sentence of Agera's was also relayed to Carrera through Esprit.

And because Esprit had a bad personality, she didn't tell Agera about her power.

*He'll definitely get in trouble later. Teehee.*

She was enjoying herself as if it had nothing to do with her.

However, Garcia's next comment froze her expression.

"You think I'm impatient? What a bunch of idiots. Haven't you noticed the difference in our abilities yet? Is your master that purple-haired kid? Or is it the cheeky blonde? That white-haired beauty may be famous, but she's still just a frog in a well after all is said and done."

With that, Garcia spun his spear around and thrust it right at Agera. Then, as if proud of his victory, he dropped another bombshell.

"Let me tell you, ignorant people, that there are real monsters in this world. If you knew the power of Velgrynd-sama, the Lord Marshal's true identity, you would understand the meaning of my words. Besides, Lieutenant Kondou is a terrifying man. Whether it's those demons, or your masters, they're no match for him. You'll just be killed off miserably like the insects you are!"

It was only when Esprit heard this that she finally succeeded in stopping the flow of information that was being sent to Carrera. She had been impatient and took a long time to shut down her Skill.

But it was already too late.


![hard scene break]


"Hahaha, just now, I heard an interesting story through Esprit."

Carrera spoke cheerfully.

Despite her tone, there was a hint of anger in her voice.

"Hmm, what kind of a story?"

Ultima asked.

She had a rough idea of what it was going to be about.

"The enemy inside the gate, he called you a kid."

"Hm, hmm..."

A vein appeared on Ultima's forehead.

Veyron began panicking.

He regretted that he should have gone through the gate as soon as possible if he had known this would happen.

He deeply understood that sometimes ignorance was a blessing.

"He said that Testa was a frog in a well."

"I'm a frog...?"

Testarossa was mortified.

She had often been praised for her beauty, but she never remembered ever being scorned. This was the first time she had ever been called a frog, and she was filled with unspeakable anger.

"And by the way, he called us insects."

Benimaru's eyebrows shot up in surprise.

"So, first we were maggots, and now we're insects?"

He muttered in an unamused tone.

At first glance, Benimaru looked calm, but he was still thinking to himself that he should have taken care of things with his own hands.

Souei was the only one who was truly calm.

"She is able to maintain a channel in the other world created by Velgrynd-sama? That's an interesting ability."

He crossed his arms and kept silent but remained fixated on Esprit's Skill.

Now that Souei had found out, Esprit would have to deal with many requests from Souei in the future---but that was just another story.

![break]

Carrera's report continued.

"They've been taunting us, saying that we won't stand a chance against Velgrynd-sama and Kondou. They seem to want to be killed miserably."

She spoke plainly, but that was because she was too busy dealing with her own emotions. Carrera liked to stir things up, but she hated to be incited herself.

"You never know who's able to win until you try it yourself." Testarossa spoke without expression.

In fact, it was true that she had not won against Velgrynd. Nevertheless, Testarossa was not shying away from defeat, but was quite serious.

Her crimson eyes told everyone eloquently that she would not lose the next time.

"By the way, Carrera. I've never understood why he called us insects. Is he really that strong?"

"Ahaha, that's not possible, is it though? Even if it is, he's unforgivable."

Carrera denied Ultima's question with a laugh. Her eyes were not smiling at all. They were filled with a dangerous color and looked as if they were about to explode.

"There's no need for mercy then, huh?"

"Of course. He's just a human being, you know that?"

Ultima was furious.

Carrera agreed while trying to hold back her rage.

"What a pity. I wanted to teach him a lesson with my own hands. Tell Agera not to be lenient, and then we'll talk about pardon later."

"Of course. He insulted us, so he should get what is deserved."

There was no one on the scene to stop the girls from talking.

Ultima was cruel to the point of naivety.

Testarossa's cynical smile could strike fear into the hearts of any who saw it.

And Carrera was optimistically spreading destruction and emptiness.

There was not the slightest hint of compassion to be given.

Never giving comfort to their enemies. For them, mercy was letting them die comfortably, and forgiveness was killing them as they suffered. Either way, it was still killing, but for them there was a difference.

As Veyron listened to the conversation between the demonesses, he cursed the man who was Agera's enemy.

His superiors, the devil lords, were not to be offended. Even so, they ranted and raved.

Veyron was holding his head inwardly.

*Stupid human! The price for your stupidity will have to be taken on your own...at least I hope so.*

He couldn't help but hope so.

Veyron knew very well the horrors of Ultima. More than that, his fear of Carrera and Testarossa, the other adversaries, was indescribable.

The fate of the world could be changed depending on where their anger was directed.

*At the very least, we must get rid of that fool as soon as possible and appease their anger. Please, Agera! You're our only hope!!*

As a great demon, Veyron could only lament the fact that he could not do anything in this situation, and instead put his hope in Agera, a lower-level demon.

Regardless of the intentions of these demons, Benimaru gave the order.

"Carrera, can you convey our words inside?"

"Well, I've never tried it before, but I guess I could..."

"Then tell him not to allow any more offensive remarks."

Carrera nodded.

She forced herself into the channel with Esprit, wishing she had done so sooner.

<Esprit, can you hear me?>

<Geh, Carrera-sama?!>

<You owe me one for what you just said. More than that--->

Carrera smirked.

And then, with a grudge in her heart, she gave the order.


![hard scene break]


<Teare that man to pieces. Tell Agera to crush his soul.>

Carrera's voice echoed in Esprit's brain.

<Benimaru-sama wants it, too. Know that failure is not an option!!>

'Oh no, my power has been exposed to the executives,' Esprit lamented. In addition, Carrera was still forcing her to intervene, but she was resigned to the fact that there was no choice in the matter. It wasn't the first time her boss had been unreasonable.

Esprit called out to Agera, thinking as such.

"H-Hey Agera. Carrera-sama and the others are pretty angry. If we don't get rid of them soon, we're going to be in trouble."

"I can't stop wondering about how Carrera-sama knows what's going on here, but---I guess that's not the point. We need to prepare ourselves first. Since he's insulted even our Lord, I believe he deserves to be punished accordingly!"

"Tsk, you seem really mad too!"

Esprit let out a sigh, noticing that the normally calm Agera was furious.

It was impossible to stop him now. Or, rather, it was convenient that way. If Agera was going to get serious, then the only thing to do now was watch. However, Garcia shouted, unable to read the atmosphere.

"You guys are weak as shit. Just give up and die! You can rest easy. Your masters are about to be dealt with anyway. So in the afterlife, you'll be able to serve them as you always have!"

Garcia's statement was also conveyed to Carrera through Esprit.

And this time, it wasn't just Carrera, but the whole group who heard it through the 'Telepathy Net'.

"This bastard is full of shit."

"What the hell is Agera doing? Didn't I say to kill him right away? Is he messing with me?"

"Hey, hey, don't embarrass me."

"We're lucky that Shion's not here. If she were here, this whole operation would've been ruined."

"That's true. Hey, if it doesn't work, I'll replace them, so decide quickly."

And so on, and so forth.

Indeed, if Shion had been there, Agera's wishes would have been ignored. It wouldn't have bothered Esprit, but it would have hurt his pride as a demon.

Or rather, he felt that his reputation was being ruined at present.

*Wow, that sucks!*

Those were Esprit's true feelings.

Although Garcia's crude behavior made him look like a small fry, his ability was real. He was a surprisingly troublesome opponent. However, in this case, there was no choice but to produce results. If they didn't defeat Garcia soon, they were sure to incur the wrath of the top brass.

And yet, Agera didn't seem to make a move, simply focusing on evasion.

As long as he was not fatally wounded, Agera could not be defeated. But this was meaningless if he could not win. In that case, Esprit should have done something with magic, but this was not realistic. After she tried various things, it turned out that Garcia had a high resistance to magic.

"What's the matter?! All you can do is run away!"

Garcia was getting carried away.

Even so, Agera showed no pretense of fighting back.

"Hey, Agera! We're in serious trouble. If we don't hurry up, Carrera-sama is going to get really mad!"

Even the demons that followed her were afraid of their master's domineering authority when she was serious. If that anger were to be directed at them, they would be nothing but terrified.

Esprit, who was usually aloof, was now in a real panic. And yet, Agera still remained silent.

Incidentally, Zonda was preparing a cup of tea at a distance, as if he had nothing to do with it. He seemed to be planning to serve the executives when he got out of here, but from Esprit's point of view, this was simply nonsense.

"Hey, Zonda! What the hell are you doing while I'm not looking?!"

"Just take a look and you will see. Agera-dono doesn't seem to be injured and is free."

"Don't be stupid, asshole! Why am I the only one who needs to feel pressured?!"

Esprit shouted as if wanting to bite him.

Zonda simply replied with a smile on his face.

"I don't know."

*I'm gonna kill him*---Esprit gritted her teeth.

He was a viscount class, yet he was not even afraid of Esprit, a count class.

*Well, after all, if you're going to serve Ultima-sama, you'll have to be thick-skinned like that.*

Thinking about it, Esprit had no choice but to stop dwelling on this.

Since Zonda was useless, she would simply have to hope Agera does his best.

There was no doubt that Agera was pissed off, so there must be a reason why he was not attacking. If he was trying to do something, she could only hope for it to come soon.

But then, Agera said something outrageous.

"Esprit, I'll tell you what I understand."

"---What?"

"It seems that, to my chagrin, it is impossible for me to defeat him with my own strength."

"Huh?!"

'You've got to be kidding me', Esprit thought.

There was no way she could tell her bosses that they couldn't win. Normally, Carrera was a mischievous person, but when she got mad, she was out of control.

What's more, she should be watching the battle right now.

It was necessary to question Agera's intentions before the bosses became angry.

"What do you mean?"

"Nothing, it's quite simple. This man, wearing his warrior's armor, has increased not only his attack power but also his defense. He realized that no matter how many times I hit him with my sword, I would be unable to slay him."

The effects of the Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative's ability to 'defeat and conquer' combined with the defensive power of the Legendary-grade armor had led to Garcia's defense being raised to the equivalent of mythical-grade. Agera had seen through this and knew that his sword would not be able to penetrate.

"...Could that be the reason my magic didn't work?"

"Indeed. His movements are not a big deal, but I can't hurt him."

Agera made a good point, and Esprit could only frown and nod. If they couldn't win, they would have no choice but to report it to Carrera, but that would only ruin their reputation...

Without Agera's advice, Esprit had also observed Garcia and understood that she was inferior to him in strength.

In the first place, their own abilities were inferior to the ultimate power. A True Dragon would be able to defeat an Ultimate Skill with even a simple attack, but that was because they hosted the strongest willpower of any spiritual life form.

Esprit was also a demon peer and was of a higher level spirit life form. However, their will power was not as strong as an Ultimate Skill.

As long as they didn't do something about this reality, there would be no victory even if they surpassed the enemy in ability.

"Hahahahaha! It seems that you have finally understood the difference in our abilities and have given up."

Garcia laughed.

He was annoyed that his speak couldn't hit, but he was still okay with that. This was because Garcia's role was to stall the enemy here. If he waited until the enemy was exhausted, victory would be assured. Even if he didn't wait that long, his friends guarding the other gates would finish off the enemy and rush to his aid. That's why Garcia could enjoy the battle without any panic.

Seeing Garcia like this, Esprit clicked her tongue. And then, in a serious voice, she questioned Agera.

"You knew this was going to happen and you were still going to challenge Kondou, right? Don't you have some kind of plan to win?"

Hearing this, Agera smirked.

"Of course I do. I need your help for my secret plan."

There was no option for Esprit to decline.

"...Tell me."

In fact, this was all Agera's plan to get Esprit to say those words.

The aloof Esprit had a hedonistic side to her. Even if Agera asked her in a normal way, she would never have said yes.

Esprit was a she-devil who took pleasure in seeing her friends cry out in distress. Agera, who knew this well, decided to push Esprit until she felt in trouble.

*Although, if that had touched Carrera-sama's reverse scale, I might have been purged as well.*

Agera was happy that he had won the bet.

Before Esprit changed her mind, he told her his secret plan.

"Turning the power of your will into a blade and striking down the enemy. That's the only way."

Perhaps, no matter what Agera did, Garcia would not understand. Even if he aimed at the gap in the armor, the blade would be blocked by the aura covering the entire body.

The defensive power sublimated to mythical-grade was not limited to the appearance, and it completely protected the owner's body.

In terms of movement alone, Agera was lightly superior to Garcia. This was the reason why it was still difficult to make an effective strike.

If this was the case, then Agera had to reach the same level.

Listening to the voice of the sword and becoming one with it. To achieve this goal---

With all his strength, Agera listened to the voice of the sword that he was born with. In doing so, he came to a conclusion.

"Hmm. We can't pierce his armor with our will alone, can we?"

"Trust me. Esprit, you may not be as talented as Carrera-sama, but you're still as skilled as a master. You may not like swords, but you have good sense. Therefore, I believe you are worthy of my trust."

"Huh? What are you talking about---?"

"Put your hand on my back. And I'll take care of the rest."

Unable to understand what Agera was saying, Esprit was confused. But still, she decided to trust Agera.

Agera stood still. Esprit did as she was told and touched his back.

As if to ridicule the demons, Garcia shouted in a high-pitched voice.

"So you've finally given up! All right, I'll make you comfortable now. It's about time your master, Demon Lord Rimuru, was killed by Velgrynd-sama. It's the end of the line for such a lowly monster, but I'm sure you'll be glad to have a guide on the road to Hades!"

"Ah?"

That comment was absolutely unforgivable.

"Do you despise our god, Rimuru-sama, as a lowly monster?"

"And to top it all off...you say that it's about time to be killed?!"

Hearing these words through Esprit, the executives' auras changed. But before that, Agera, and even Esprit, had already run out of patience.

"All right, guys. I give you credit for putting up with my insults, but if you're going to keep your reason here, then just stop being demons! I forgive you. Kill him now!!"

The two of them had been planning to do so all along, not even needing to hear Carrera's orders.

"Esprit, use my power!"

"I don't know what's going on but leave it to me. I'm going to kill that son of a bitch!!"

In a fit of rage, the two made their move.

Agera had awakened to his powers by throwing his consciousness into the sword and speaking to it.

![break]

<<I will respond to your wish. Sharpen your mind and turn your body into a blade.>>

![break]

He thought he heard a beautiful voice, but its authenticity was unknown. But the power was certainly Agera's.

"I am the blade, the indestructible blade that destroys my enemies!" Agera shouted, and at the same time, a golden sword appeared in Esprit's hand.

Ultimate Gift 'Blade Transformation'---that was the power that Agera had acquired. The effect was simple and straightforward: Agera's body was transformed into a sword, and his skill-level was added to that of the holder.

However, if the wielder had a high level of skill, the effect would be immeasurable.

Esprit drew her sword in a natural, fluid motion.

The blade, drawn from its golden scabbard, was also of a brilliant platinum, and its afterimage scattered eight petals.

The name of the sword drawing technique was the highest technique of the "Oboro Shinmei-ryu," Yaezakura---Hakkasen.

"You're dead, you trash!"

"Huh? Wh-What...What?"

Garcia couldn't see it, couldn't understand it.

What had just happened?

The defensive prey seemed to glow, and then disappeared.

He understood that it had turned into a sword, but there was no time to wonder why. He had no time to wonder why because he would have been killed before that.

Garcia was confident in his defenses because all attacks would be nullified before his ultimate power. It would take an ultimate power as powerful as Garcia's to defeat him. He couldn't sense such power from the demons he was dealing with. That's why he had felt at ease and took his time to hunt them down.

And yet, the situation had changed in an instant.

Garcia's armor was torn as thin as paper, and his body was shredded into tiny pieces.

That's right, he was sliced up eight times in an instant, and his life was cut short without even allowing him time to think.

---No, there was still time to think.

In Esprit's hand was a small red ball, an embodied soul.

"Hmm, so this guy's is red, huh? Quite a typical color, huh?"

"I think he just doesn't know what he amounts to."

Esprit muttered, to which Agera, now in human form, replied. Then, glaring viciously at the red ball, he spat out.

"No warrior can remain silent when his lord is insulted, you fool! But alas! It was my task to admonish you, but I didn't expect the words of a such little man to have set me into a rage..."

Esprit gave Agera a rare word of comfort.

"Well, well. This time it was an insult to Rimuru-sama, so it couldn't be helped. Carrera-sama has said she forgives you, so maybe you're worrying too much."

"Well, then let's just leave it at that, shall we?"

While responding, Agera vowed to be more diligent.

Esprit looked at Agera with some envy.

![break]

Just now, clearly---Agera had acquired a new Skill.

And then he remembered.

He remembered his old self, the one who had trained to become a master of the sword. Not all of his memories had returned, but only the sword skills he mastered had reappeared in his body. Or perhaps he should say that they had been completely recreated.

The "Oboro Shinmei-ryu," the supreme sword technique for dispelling demons, had been recreated.

When he was a human, Agera believed that his soul had resided in his sword.

Was that why?

When he turned himself into a sword, his memories came back to him.

He realized for the first time the meaning of why he had taken the form of a samurai.

Before he was reborn as a demon in this world, he was a samurai.

*Byakuya Araki was my name, wasn't it? Hm, even if a dead man wandered out now, it would only confuse everyone...Hakurou.*

The image of Hakurou flashed through his mind.

His disciples had grown up successfully and had inherited a new school called "Oboro-ryu."

Agera himself had changed the name to "Oboro-ryu," as he felt that "Shinmei" was not appropriate for a monster^[Basically, "Shinmei" refers to a god/divinity so "Oboro" meaning "haze" makes more sense for monsters.]. That memory came to mind, but...

*Kukuku, getting "named" by Rimuru-sama, isn't that even the heart's fate understood? If that's the case, there will be no curtain for me to appear.*

In this world, he had become a family with the Ogre tribe and had a daughter, and Hakurou was the child his daughter bore when she grew up.

In this age, there were many people whom Hakurou had cultivated.

The most prominent of these was Agera's lord, Rimuru, and all of the achievements in raising Rimuru could be attributed to Hakurou.

Agera was honestly happy to know that the skills he had trained and refined would be passed on---It would be churlish to interfere now.

Agera thought about this and switched his mindset.

He had lost interested in the garbage that had just been killed.

Agera turned on his heel and headed for Carrera, his current master.


![hard scene break]


The three demons came out of the gate and were greeted with cheers from the officers.

"Well done, I'm proud of you too!"

Carrera patted Agera on the back with a bang, which almost killed him.

"Ladies and gentlemen, the refreshments are ready."

Freshly brewed tea and sandwiches were laid out on the neatly arranged table. This was Zonda's work, and it was also well received.

Putting off the discussion for a later time, Esprit handed the red orb to Carrera.

"This is the soul of that rude man. The core of his heart has been locked away, so his ego is still intact!"

"Nice, Esprit! Now we can punish this fool for insulting Rimuru-sama."

"Yes, yes. By the way, Carrera, can you leave that to me?" Ultima interrupted, and Carrera tossed her the red orb.

"If that's okay with you, Benimaru-san, it's fine with me." She waited for Benimaru's decision.

"Do what you want."

There was no need to ask.

Benimaru had no taste for torturing the dead, and since he had no control over the soul, he had no choice but to leave the matter to the demons.

Normally, it would be a violation of principle to deal with an opponent who has already won or lost. But this time, Garcia's comment was unacceptable. Benimaru couldn't bring himself to stop them, and so, the red orb fell into Ultima's hands.

"Okay, let's go! Grudge Curse Destruction!"

It was a deadly poison refined by Ultima. It was not a physical substance, but rather a dangerous one that destroyed the spiritual body and even invaded the astral body as well. There was no way that the red orb, the embodiment of the soul, could withstand it, and Garcia screamed out in pain.

<S-stop it, stop it---Gehhh!!>

But Ultima only laughed happily.

"Yes, yes. The effect is outstanding!"

"By the way, what kind of effect does it have?" Testarossa asked.

It wasn't that she didn't know, but that she wanted to let Garcia hear it.

"Well, it keeps you suffering until the power of the soul wears away. This guy has a lot of energy, so I think he'll enjoy it for a long time. It'll probably take a thousand years, but then you'll be reborn as a pure white and beautiful soul!" Ultima replied happily.

Garcia sobbed inaudibly. He wondered where he had made the wrong choice, and deeply regretted it now.

"Well, that's very kind of you. I'm sure he'll be grateful for the opportunity to atone for his sins." Testarossa said with a smile.

'That's impossible'---Benimaru thought, but for once he didn't offer any help, he just let it be.

Zonda served them, and they took a short break.

Esprit, wondering how they could afford to do so, opened her mouth in an attempt to keep things interesting.

"To be honest, when Agera said he couldn't win, I didn't know what to do."

Now that the mood was peaceful, Esprit felt like complaining lightly. She knew that Agera would have a plan, but he had taken advantage of her confusion, and that's why she was still upset.

"I didn't say that I couldn't win."

Agera replied back, but in reality, he hadn't been entirely sure about his plan. He was glad that he had succeeded, but if the 'Blade Transformation' had failed, he would have been blindsided.

"But you should have at least consulted me beforehand! It's okay because we won, but I wouldn't take responsibility for if we lost!"

It had been a long time since she had been as desperate as she was this time, even though Esprit was usually hiding in a safe zone. This made her even more irritated with Agera.

Ultima nodded in response, laughing.

"Well, we couldn't afford to lose, even by any chance. Or rather, I wouldn't allow it. Rimuru-sama wouldn't be mad if we lost, but we can't die."

"You're right. That's what I thought, too, which is why I've been monitoring you through Esprit."

Carrera seemed to be a laissez-faire type of person, but if Agera and the others were about to lose, she would have been the first to move in.

From that point of view, what would follow would have been a serious attack by the executives. Although that might be considered a shameful thing to do, they needed to be prepared for any eventuality.

Esprit, perhaps feeling uneasy after the discussion, asked in a whisper.

"Um, is Shion-sama going to be okay? The battle is over for us, but she hasn't come out yet..."

Esprit, who had thought that Shion would be fine, suddenly became worried.

Benimaru replied with a nonchalant look on his face.

"No problem. She might be the kind of person who would forget her objective, but she doesn't seem to be struggling."

Souei nodded in agreement.

"She's overzealous. The same attacks over and over again won't work, so she should consider different ways to attack."

Esprit wondered at that statement, as if he could see it in his eyes.

"...Are you aware of what's going on inside?"

It was Testarossa who spoke up in response.

"Isn't it obvious? I'm staying because I have to be ready in case something happens to the officers."

At this point, Carrera and Ultima spewed out their tea.

"---What?!"

"Wait a minute, Testarossa. What is it then? Did you know what was going on in there without Esprit's information?"

"Of course I did."

Testarossa's smile deepened as she smiled at them.

Hearing this, Carrera shouted as if she had just realized something.

"Then are you also watching Rimuru-sama fight too?!"

"Ah!"

Ultima jumped up, as if the possibility had just occurred to her.

"That's not fair, Testarossa!"

"Seriously, you shouldn't do that! It's just like Diablo. Why do you always think that all that matters is what's good for you? Don't you think you should invite us as well?"

Carrera and Ultima were upset, but Testarossa kept a cool face.

So did Benimaru and Souei. As the people in charge of gathering information, they thought that this was a battle they could not miss.

Shion, by the way, was unaware of this. That's why she had been the first to jump into the gate. If Shion had been watching Rimuru's fight, she would not have moved until it was over. Benimaru knew this, which was why he had kept it a secret from Shion. In any case, it was necessary to pacify the disgruntled Carrera and the others. Benimaru had no choice but to explain.

"As mentioned, the monitoring by Moss is very convenient---I've had him enter all eight gates to do individual surveillance."

'It worked without a hitch', Benimaru concluded.

This meant that Moss was still gathering information even now.

Benimaru had strictly ordered him not to move without doing something, so that the enemy inside would not detect him.

"That's right. I tried it myself, but I couldn't touch the other gates. It seems that Agera is the one who killed the enemy."

"Of course, I couldn't get in either."

Aside from Zonda, who had done nothing, Esprit had also lost the right to try again.

It was unclear what Velgrynd was thinking, but it was confirmed that once you entered, you would not be able to enter any other gates unless you directly defeated the enemy.

"That's to be expected."

"Yeah. It was a good decision to let them enter from the beginning."

Benimaru, Souei and Testarossa all nodded to one another.

"So, if any of us have a hard time, Testarossa will come to our aid?"

"Yes, that's right. Actually, I don't think that's going to happen, and I've got other things on my mind, but I'll be there if you need me."

"No need---is what I'd like to say, but it's Rimuru-sama's orders. I'm going to try to win, so don't be too hasty." Carrera said, smiling wryly, and Benimaru and the others nodded, as if they felt the same way.

At this point, Benimaru changed his expression and spoke to Carrera.

"Carrera, about your opponent, don't let your guard down."

"Of course, but why say that?"

"Kondou, I believe, was the only one who noticed Moss and took him out with a single bullet."

"Huh...That's interesting." Smiling wryly, Carrera seemed more interested than afraid of her opponent's strength.

![break]

"I'm not worried about you, but if something happens, you can call for help through Esprit." Testarossa said, and Carrera responded by raising one hand.

Her demeanor eloquently told her that it was not necessary. Typical Carrera, Testarossa smiled.

Then, the officers resumed their assault on the gate.

Shion was fighting in one of them, so there were only six left.

Excluding the gate guarded by Velgrynd, five gates were now opened at once.


![hard scene break]


Shion was alone, fighting hard.

Outside the gates, the atmosphere was peaceful, but now Shion was facing the enemy with a fierce expression on her face. Her opponent was Minaza, the sixth-ranked knight of the Single Digits, one of the four head knights and also a female knight.

Shion breathed heavily with her shoulders and gave Minaza an indignant glare.

"I'll give you praise for giving me so much trouble!" She shouted loudly, her voice full of spirit.

Minaza, for her part, was not unharmed. Her uniform was torn and her bare skin was exposed. But there was nothing sexy about it.

And rightfully so.

Minaza had stopped her Mimicry long ago and was giving it her all in her true form.

"Shut up! I'm the one who should be giving the praise. All for your futile efforts! I praise you for defeating my children, but I'll have to repay that grudge."

At Minaza's feet, there were a great many dead insectoids. All of them had been slaughtered by Shion.

Yes, the insect-type higher form, an insectar, was the true identity of Minaza.

"Hmph! A small fish like that doesn't count as a thing to me. I'm used to the training grounds, where many more powerful individuals spring up."

"I beg your pardon?"

"Fufufu, it's a shame. I am an experienced woman, despite my appearance. This is not the first time I've fought an insect-type beast!"

Although exhausted, Shion still had plenty of energy left. The smug Shion looked down on Minaza and told her as such. Then, as if remembering, she continued.

"Speaking of which... Now that I think about it, Razul was not an insectoid, but rather a bug-shaped majin (insectar). He said it was in its full form, so I'm sure it was."

Hearing this, Minaza's face changed.

"Razul? You're the one who defeated the guardian god of the West?!"

Shion nodded her head.

"I didn't take him on alone, but I was the one who defeated him. He was a strong opponent."

Hearing this, Minaza muttered to herself, "I see." Then she turned her face down and started laughing with a 'kukuku.'

"So, you got rid of him! He betrayed us. We are an Aggressor race from the otherworld, but His Majesty Rudra accepted us and we finally found a safe place to live. And yet, he continued to be an unmitigated and selfish fool, not showing any reverence."

Even if it was explained like that, it didn't make sense to Shion. She just looked at Minaza with an expression that seemed to say, 'What the hell is she talking about?' However, there was one thing that bothered her, so she decided to take the opportunity to ask.

"Let me ask you something, aside from Razul, did you send any of your people to other places?"

Shion was curious about her friends Zegion and Apito. If they knew each other, it might not be a good idea to kill Minaza. Thinking so, she asked just in case.

"There are many races in the otherworld. Through the Underworld Gate that sometimes opens, various Aggressors target this world. There are us insectars and cryptids of similar nature. And then there are the phantoms. Unlike demons, we are semi-spiritual, so we can materialize on this world if we take our time."

Shion didn't care if she didn't get an answer, but Minaza was kind enough to tell her.

What Minaza meant by "Underworld Gate" was the "Gate of Hell", a term familiar to Diablo and her friends, but Shion just thought it was hot.

Minaza said that the Underworld was a place where the three major races fought for supremacy. There was also a parallel world, which was a hell where the demons reigned.

The world was very poor, and there was nothing to feed on. That's why it was said that they were vigilantly targeting this world. It was said that they had been sending their people to this world many times since long ago in order to expand their territory. Insectoids such as the Army Wasps were also a kind of Aggressor.

"Well, some of them are unfaithful to us, and we sometimes get into a bit of trouble."

Razul, whom Shion and the others had defeated, was a representative of such a race. It was proof that them and Minaza were not monolithic, although Shion remembered something else.

Apito and Zegion had been picked up by Rimuru after escaping from someone, right?

*There is no doubt that they are enemies!*

Although she had no particular reason to believe it, Shion decided as such. She trusted her intuition, and she was proud of the fact that she had never been wrong in such a situation.

This time, too, Shion's intuition was correct.

It was not a coincidence.

Shion was deeply connected to Rimuru---by Ciel and his Skill---because she had once died and come back to life. Therefore, her computing power interfered, and she was able to correctly discern the truth from the fragmented information she had already obtained.

"In short, you are the enemy, aren't you?"

"Hahaha, what are you saying now? Thanks to your stalling, I will be able to revive my beautiful children once again!"

As soon as she shouted this, Minaza's lower body swelled up. Though hidden by the skirt of her uniform, Minaza's lower body was also covered with several mouths. And from each of those mouths, all at once, a wicked egg was being produced.

"Hahaha! You may look strong, but you're exhausted from fighting my children. You think you can win against this many---Waah?!"

Minaza's triumphant words came to a halt.

It was only natural.

A single flash of Shion's "Hercules Ex" was enough to knock out a large number of the insect beasts.

"That's not possible! My children... With the help of His Majesty Rudra, they should have been reborn as warriors with overwhelming power..."

Minaza's power was a power similar to Apito's 'Queen Worship'. It was called the Unique Skill 'Gluttony Rebirth', and by eating the corpses of the children she had given birth to, she could regenerate them over and over again. In addition, the Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative' loaned by Rudra had reinforced the system and greatly reduced the time required for rebirth.

The numerous insect-type majins that were produced were as strong an opponent to Shion as Minaza was proud of. Each of them was as good as a greater majin, and some of them were as fierce as a Demon Lord Seed.

However...

Shion had defeated all of them, though it was a hard fight.

That being the case, there would be no second time.

Using 'Optimal Action', the essence of the Unique Skill 'Cook', the insect-type majins were defeated in an instant.

Minaza was astonished. Even if she didn't fight herself, she could exhaust her opponents just wearing them down with the children over and over again. She was so good at such tactics that she was confused in the face of a non-standard opponent like Shion.

But she was still a queen. She did not repeat her mistake and stood up in a rage.

"I won't forgive you. My children, lend your strength to the Queen Mother!"

"Interesting, I'll accept your challenge!"

Minaza, with the children's power at her disposal, shifted into battle form. Shion happily intercepted her with her Hercules Ex.

And so, the long battle began.

![break]

It was a back-and-forth battle of offense and defense.

Minaza's attacks wounded Shion, but she was instantly healed by the activation of Ultraspeed Regeneration. And Shion's attacks were unable to damage Minaza's exoskeleton. Equipped with legendary-grade armor and protected by Ultimate Enchantment, Minaza was now so strong that even mythical-grade weapons would have difficulty damaging it.

Minaza's speed was greater than Shion's, but Shion's strength was greater. Minaza had the advantage in defense, while Shion had the advantage in resilience.

"Damn it, not this again. Those bugs are hard, and really nasty."

Shion wanted to break Minaza's exoskeleton, no matter how small the wound. Then the rest could be cooked by 'Cook'. Minaza was desperate not to let that happen. She was not underestimating Shion, but to be honest, she felt threatened by her strength, which far exceeded her expectations.

*I can't believe it. I can't believe that she can fight me in this form so evenly...*

The amount of magicules was enormous as it appeared, but if that was the only reason, there was no way she should have struggled. What made Shion troublesome was that while she appeared to be sloppy, she was actually quite skilled with a sword.

She was not as good as Benimaru, but she had still been recognized by Hakurou, her master. In other words, she was a licensed swordsman. This, combined with Shion's strength, made Minaza's rampage a nightmare.

Shion, however, was not satisfied. She wanted to defeat Minaza quickly and move on, but she was stronger than she had thought.

*As expected of a warrior at the top of the Empire. As Rimuru-sama had said, she was an opponent I couldn't let my guard down against.*

She didn't think about that until now.

Shion usually didn't think too much. Now that she had, she began to think about a possible clue to defeating her opponent.

It was just a temporary thing, but it was better that she realized that she needed to use her head.

However, it was not as if a good idea would come to you just by using your brain. Though uninspired, Shion had Ciel's blessing.

![break]

<<You have the power. It took a while to choose the best race out of all the possibilities, but now it has been decided. The one that is most suitable for you--->>

![break]

Hearing that voice, Shion remembered.

Rimuru had asked her some questions when he gave her the reward, but Shion had not thought deeply about it. She remembered saying that she would leave everything to him, but nothing had changed since then.

Shion did not care about the evolution of the others.

Benimaru had evolved from an oni to a "flame spirit oni", which meant that he became as powerful as a divine oni.

Shion, on the other hand, was still an oni.

But she didn't mind, because she was strong enough as she was.

But that was not enough to defeat Minaza.

It was inevitable that Shion would seek power, and in response to her desire, the Soul Corridor was connected.

![break]

<<---A "Battle spirit oni" is a good choice. It is a high-ranking holy spirit and boasts unparalleled strength in material terms. Next is the verification of Skills--->>

![break]

*I'll leave that up to you*---Shion decided, tossing the matter aside. Then she concentrated on Minaza.

Shion's demeanor was brusque, but for some reason, she seemed to hear a hint of happiness in the voice. It may have been Shion's imagination, but there was a real change that occurred.

"What the hell is wrong with you?! That gushing, intense youki... Have you been slacking off until now---?!"

The spirit surpasses the body.

Therefore, Shion's racial awakening was accelerated as the voice of her heart demanded. The evolutionary possibilities were managed by Ciel, and the best ones were selected.

Shion evolved into a rare but powerful divine spirit, a "battle spirit oni". Her body had 'Infinite Regeneration' and she was immortal as long as her magicules existed. Attacks launched from her body were not limited to physical damage, but also destroyed the mind. Despite the fact that she was a spiritual life form with no weaknesses, she had an advantage against all attributes.

Shion had evolved into an existence that could be called a natural enemy of spiritual life forms.

Shion's evolution had also changed her physical form. Her body was optimized to be more specialized for combat.

She realized this halfway, by instinct. As if she had stretched out under a clear blue sky, she felt refreshed.

Shion held her favorite sword, the new Hercules Ex, in her hand.

"Did I keep you waiting? But now my time with you is over." In a polite tone, Shion spoke to Minaza.

"Don't underestimate me! Just as you have hidden your power, I will reveal my true form!"

True to her words, Minaza's form had become even more deformed. She even cut down her own lifespan, and became even more aggressive as she tried to fight Shion.

And so the battle began---

"Those who seek to take our safe haven shall die in pain! Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative' unleash your full power... Come forth, emergents! I will feed on my own flesh and use my instincts to destroy my enemies."

"Chaotic Fate!!"

---It was over in an instant.

The evil and forbidden final attack that Minaza was about to make was crushed by Shion's sword before it could be seen in full.

In front of the shattered pieces of flesh, Shion declared.

"You've been so annoying and talking too much."

"...Wha...What the hell is..."

One of the pieces of flesh lying around was Minaza's head, more than half of which was missing. Minaza realized that her inevitable death was imminent, but she couldn't accept the reality and was gravely upset.

Looking down coldly at Minaza, Shion asked.

"Do you need some help finishing you off^[Shion actually says "Do you need a **Kaishakunin**?" A **Kaishakunin** is a person appointed to behead an individual who has performed seppuku (ritual suicide). Normally, seppuku is a slow agony, so the Kaishakunin will quickly finish the person off.]?"

For Minaza, Shion was the worst possible match.

Before she had evolved into a "battle spirit oni", she was just an even match with or without an Ultimate Skill. From this point on, there was no way Minaza could win when she was only evenly matched against Shion, who had no Ultimate Skill.

As a result of Shion's evolution, the power of her will had reached the ultimate realm. Shion's favorite sword had also evolved to a mythical-grade that could be called "Hercules Deluxe".

If Minaza's power had not been borrowed, it would have been a different story, but she was not strong enough to deal with Shion now.

"Guh, hah... That's ridiculous... You're too strong. B-but, my children will ..." Minaza said as if blind. But her hopes had already been dashed. Shion's Chaotic Fate had sliced and diced all living things.

"If only it were that way."

Shion's words were a mercy.

"...You're so naive. So naive... You can't win against the Insect Lord-sama that way..."

That's when Minaza's energy ran out. Her life was gone and Shion's victory was assured.

"...Insect lord?"

The words Minaza had left behind held a very important meaning. But Shion didn't care about any of that.

"Well, I suppose it's none of my business!" she said with a refreshing detachment, and did not even try to remember it.

![break]

Thus, Minaza, an invader from the otherworld, met a pitiful end along with her children.

The queen, who had sought to establish an insectar paradise under the protection of Emperor Rudra, disappeared from the world just before achieving her ambition.


![hard scene break]


Veyron was the second most powerful of the seven demon peers. He was a duke-class, undefeated for over 4,000 years. Despite this, he was unable to stand up to the warrior-like figure of Marco in front of him and was humiliated to be lying on the floor.

Marco had correctly used the Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative' by imitating Kondou's form with the Unique Skill 'Impersonator'. By imitating Kondou with the Unique Skill 'Impersonator', Marco was able to use the Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative' correctly. He had Kondou's Skills at his disposal, and he was efficient without the slightest bit of waste.

Veyron was a powerful opponent, but Marco was still better than him. It was only because of Veyron's high level of skill that he was able to do more than bend the knee. His combat skills, honed as a demon, were no match for Marco. It was a frightening reality, but Veyron had no fear. On the contrary, inwardly, he even enjoyed the current situation.

It was only natural. Having said that he could win in front of Ultima, his master, and all the other leaders, he had to win.

"Devil, was your name Veyron? I congratulate you on your fight, but it's useless no matter how many times you try. I've seen what you can do. I am more than capable of handling you now."

"I suppose. Since I haven't shown my true colors yet, your assessment is quite correct."

"What?"

Marco was about to recommend surrender, but Veyron's reaction made him look doubtful. In Marco's opinion, there was an enormous difference in strength between him and Veyron. It was proof that Kondou's strength was overwhelming, but to Marco, it was his own strength.

That is why he was angry at Veyron's words.

Veyron was a demon peer, but his magicules were less than a quarter of Marco's. It was difficult earlier because it wasn't one-on-one, but now it was just Veyron. Marco had a huge advantage because he was unencumbered.

And yet, Veyron merely stood up and laughed.

"You cannot defeat me by imitating others. Because I am also good at imitation."

"Huh? I beg your pardon?"

"A forgery is not as good as a true work. Do you understand that this is the truth? No."

"What are you trying to say?" Marco asked in frustration.

Veyron laughed inwardly, wishing he could just slash him instead of asking questions.

"I'll tell you now. What I consider to be the best work of art is---"

As soon as he shouted this, Veyron activated his newfound ability.

.........

......

...

Veyron is Ultima's butler.

For a long time, he was in charge of all her affairs. He had to deal with whatever his lord asked of him.

The specialized field of cooking was left to Zonda, but the other things were under Veyron's jurisdiction.

What Veyron had devised was a Unique Skill called 'Impersonator', a useful power to be able to become anything. With this 'Impersonator', it was possible to turn into anyone that Veyron saw. It was a skill similar to Marco's Impersonator, but Impersonator's accuracy was better. However, Marco was enhanced by Emperor Rudra's power. Considering this, Veyron had no chance to win, but that was not necessary to be said.

Because the person Veyron was trying to emulate was stronger than Kondou, whom Marco had imitated.

Marco was able to reproduce less than 80 percent of Kondou's strength. Veyron, who had a similar ability, knew that it was impossible to reproduce someone who was too powerful.

That is why Veyron chose a supernatural being who had charmed even his master. By copying the Demon Lord Rimuru, he hoped to utilize some of his power.

But then, Veyron heard a voice.

![break]

<<That cannot be allowed. But in return, I will grant you the power.>>

![break]

It was not the same as the "Voice of the World".

At first Veyron was puzzled, but as soon as he understood the implications, he was almost moved to tears.

*I, even as I am, am being watched over by that love!!*

As if praying to God, Veyron gave his thanks.

Veyron realized that his Skill had evolved.

Even if it was an imitation, it became art as long as it moved people. As if to prove this, there was a certain power in that ability.

Ultimate Gift 'Artist'---It was because of this that Veyron was convinced that he could beat Marco.

.........

......

...

What appeared before Marco was a young warrior with a keen eye.

"...Who? No, it doesn't matter who it is. I don't know any swordsman better than Lieutenant Kondou. You are free to imitate whomever you like, but you still won't stand a chance."

The young warrior that Veyron imitated looked very much like Agera, which was no surprise, for it was the appearance of Byakuya Araki in his younger days. This result was the ultimate culmination of imitation that Veyron had achieved.

Veyron thought to himself. A true forger would be able to copy a painting from the heyday of the artist they were trying to imitate. It was only Veyron, who had tried to master all fields of art at the behest of Ultima, who had come to this conclusion. 'Artist' could recreate the power of the copy in their prime, even if he had never actually met the person. It was a foul power indeed. And it was here that Veyron unleashed his power.

His master, Ultima, had evolved by receiving power from Rimuru. By his grace, Veyron had also grown in power. The amount of magicules Veyron now had was comparable to that of a demon lord or even an awakened demon lord.

"Wh-What?! It's as if he's a different person from before!!" Marco was astonished.

Veyron ignored Marco and materialized a sword in his hand. It was the demon's unique 'Matter Creation' ability. Although it was only a fake imitation of Agera's Blade Transformation sword, it had the effect of the Ultimate Gift 'Artist' added to it. It was a fake, and there was no doubt that its performance was as close to the real thing as possible.

Veyron took a glance at Marco and spoke.

"That's right. Certainly, this Kondou fellow is not to be underestimated. However---"

"...Just what are you trying to say?"

"Now that Carrera-sama has gone to battle, I fear his fate may soon be sealed."

"Hahaha, what nonsense!" Marco laughed at this nonsense. Marco couldn't imagine Kondou being defeated.

The two men glared at each other. As long as their arguments were incompatible, there was no choice but to settle the matter by force. They both moved at the same time.

"Baika (Plum Blossom)---Gokatotsu!!"

"'True Fake Transcendental Technique (Gallery Fake)'---Yaezakura---Hakkasen---"

The imitation was now the real thing. Veyron's eight sword flashes knocked away the five sword strands. The remaining three sword blasts cut off Marco's arms. Finally, Veyron stopped with a snap of his blade against Marco's neck.

"A-Ahh, aah..."

The intense pain from both arms caused Marco's transformation to unravel. He tried to stop the blood from flowing, but Marco had no more than elbows to speak of.

"Fufufu, I'm not going to kill you."

"Kuu, are you trying to take me hostage?"

"No, how can that be?" At this point, Veyron also changed his mind and smiled.

"I am Lady Ultima's butler, so I will do whatever it takes to please her." Marco felt a deep sense of dread as Veyron gave him an unanswerable answer.

"What are you doing to me?" Marco couldn't help but ask that question, but his reaction was already as if he had fallen into Veyron's trap. Veyron replied promptly.

"Her Ladyship is a very cruel person. The painful emotions of those who oppose her are her favorite. She doesn't kill her enemies right away, rather she rots them little by little. I am in a position to admonish her for that. And yet...and yet!!"

'I don't want to hear this'---Marco thought.

However, Veyron was ruthless.

"I love it. I, too, find nothing more pleasurable than to see a strong man begging for mercy!"

'That's why Marco is the best toy of all', Veyron's muffled voice told him.

"No, please stop. I surrender. If you want, I swear I'll never disobey you again. So---"

Marco began to plead, but no one could blame him for that. He hadn't known defeat before, so he was vulnerable when on the defensive. Besides, Marco's skills were solid, but his spirit had not been trained. His ultimate power had only been lent to him, and he had not mastered it himself. Veyron, a demon among demons, was skilled in the art of tapping into the fear of such an opponent.

"Hmm, too bad! No need to worry about it, I decline."

"Why?!"

"Because the Empire's policy is the same, isn't it? I am a supporter of that idea."

"Eh..."

"Once you start a war, you cannot surrender. It's wonderful! The weak should just submit from the start. It's too embarrassing to ask for negotiation after losing a war. It's a way of thinking that I can't help but sympathize with."

"Th-That's..."

"Isn't it so? You've done this before, so you can't be so selfish as to not want to do it when it's your turn. So---"

At this point, Veyron's mouth twisted into an ear-splitting grin. His smile was even more disturbing because he was dressed like a gentleman butler, and it left a mark on the viewer's mind.

"Take responsibility, kid. And help please Lady Ultima."

Veyron revealed his true nature. A cruel, brutal, merciless demon, befitting of Ultima's first dependent. That was Veyron.

"H-Help me...Help me, Lieutenant Kondou!" Marco's cries for help did not reach Kondou.

"Well, that cry is quite pleasant, but it may disturb others. So, please be quiet for a while." As soon as he said that, Veyron carelessly pulled out Marco's tongue.

"Guuhooo?! Woooo-woooooh!!" Marco's voiceless voice echoed in the other world, separated from this world.

As for Marco's fate after this---


![hard scene break]


Souei was in a good mood. He had been secretly watching Rimuru's battle, and now Rimuru had secured a great victory. It was fortuitous that he was able to watch the battle.

Rimuru had taken on both Veldora and Velgrynd at the same time, and still seemed to have the upper hand. He even ate Veldora and evolved. On top of that, he overwhelmed Velgrynd, undaunted by the onslaught that Souei would have been unable to resist.

How strong such a Rimuru had become could not be determined by appearance alone. Even when he tried to find out through the Soul Corridor, Souei could not sense it. Therefore, it was not just Souei's desire to know about it.

At least, Diablo had taken little action until the end and was undoubtedly staying by Rimuru's side. Although he was an annoying bastard for running away, Souei could not complain openly because he understood Diablo's point and purpose.

Speaking of annoying, there was also Testarossa.

Although she had quietly declared her intention to stay, Souei had mixed feelings when he considered the implications. Still, Souei did not oppose her, because he understood her intentions.

Perhaps Velgrynd, realizing the disadvantage, had started to protect Rudra in the middle of the battle with Rimuru. There was no guarantee that she would not come out until she had defeated the other seven gates.

*There is no way that the cunning Testarossa did not foresee the possibility of this happening, and yet she didn't point it out, which means that she thinks she can handle it by herself. I don't think she can win against Velgrynd-sama, but she has a remarkable amount of confidence.*

Souei had seen right through Testarossa's intentions. Testarossa was probably aiming for a rematch with Velgrynd. Souei hoped that he could be forgiven for being jealous of Testarossa, since she was trying to challenge an opponent that Souei could not beat.

Souei thought to himself. Benimaru, too, must have read Testarossa's thoughts and approved of them. This was because even Benimaru was no match for Velgrynd.

Benimaru, who was good at using flames, would not be able to attack Velgrynd, who could be called the god of flames. There was a possibility that he could not even buy time, and Testarossa was thought to be more suitable.

Incidentally, Souei would only be able to withstand Velgrynd for a few seconds. None of Souei's specialties would work against Velgrynd, who could control space. He would not even be allowed to escape and would end up being burned to a crisp. Being aware of this was not very fun for Souei because had to accept what would happen. Although it was not fun, he had no choice but to endorse Testarossa.

And so, Souei decided to devote himself to his work in a very complicated state of mind, feeling both happy about Rimuru's victory and dissatisfied with his own lack of strength. Rimuru's order to kill the enemy was absolute, and he had no hesitation in obeying it. For Souei, eliminating the enemy was a natural thing to do in the first place.

*Let's finish this quickly and get back to Rimuru-sama's side.*

With his loyalty to Rimuru growing even stronger, Souei went through the gate as his excited heart commanded.

![break]

He caught a glimpse of the enemy, and Souei did not hesitate to go straight for them.

The gate resembled a circular colosseum, which was the same inside all the gates. In the center of the colosseum stood his target.

"Hey, are you my opponent?" The smirking man was Gardner, the fourth rank in the Single Digit hierarchy.

"Since you've come all this way, I'll at least introduce myself. My name is Gardner. I'm in charge of his Majesty Rudra's protection. It'll be a short visit, but I hope you enjoy it."

With that, Gardner looked at Souei as if he was trying to figure out what to do with him. Gardner looked at Souei as if he were judging him. He was tingling with a secret hobby of abuse, wondering how he could torment him.

In response, Souei was silent. No, rather, after a short pause, he let out a sigh.

"Did my precious time get taken away just to deal with someone like you?" He spat this out in a vexed tone, but Gardner was not one to let that go unheard.

"...What did you say?"

"My name is Souei. If you wish to surrender, I'll accept, but you don't want to, do you?"

"Of course not!" Gardner was incensed by Souei's attitude and had fallen for Souei's schemes even before the fight began, though he was unaware of it.

"Souei, was it? According to what Kondou-san found out, you were working as an intelligence officer in the land of monsters, right? That means you're not suited for direct combat!"

Of course, Kondou's investigation was not so lukewarm. Gardner knew that Souei's strength was of a certain level and that he was daring to provoke him. He originally thought that he could win without such a challenge, but he thought it would be rewarding if he lost his cool.

It was a shallow strategy, and it was meaningless when provoked by Souei.

"You lowlife. Enough of your nonsense, let's get started."

Souei had seen through Gardner's strength in this short time. Without realizing it, Gardner recklessly slashed at Souei.

Gardner's weapon was a two-handed Blue Dragon Blade (Seiryuuto). The blade, thicker and larger than a knife, was difficult to handle but powerful. The flowing succession of attacks was magnificent, as if he were dancing. It was an attack that combined strength and sharpness with Gardner's high skill. However, it would not work against Souei.

Gardner's Seiryuuto sliced through the air, and the momentum was too much for him to keep his stance. Souei didn't miss, and the bullet that came from the shadow at Gardner's feet was sucked into the chest of his prey.

"Guha?!" Gardner coughed up blood and collapsed.

Souei emerged from the shadows to finish him off. In his hand was a Walther P99, a small handgun. Souei had secretly obtained the prototype that Rimuru had Kaijin build for him. He had been practicing to be able to shoot it from the shadow space, and the result was Gardner, who had been shot through the heart.

"Huh, how boring."

No matter how strong the opponent is, if they were caught off guard, they could be killed with a single blow---Souei believed in this kind of claim, but he also understood that there were some opponents for whom such a method would not work.

Gardner, however, was not one of them, and his plan had worked brilliantly.

After all, this bullet contained all of Souei's Skills. In addition to the 'Ultraspeed' and 'Insta-kill' of the Unique Skill 'Shadow Striker', it also had the effects of poison, paralysis, and corrosion. The initial speed of the bullet reached tens of times the speed of sound thanks to Ultraspeed, and with Insta-kill added to its power, it could destroy even spiritual bodies. With the addition of various abnormalities, Gardner's death was certain. Everyone, not just Souei, would have judged it as such.

But then---

"Idiot, you let your guard down!"

Such a voice came from behind Souei as he began to walk towards the gate. Before he could do so, Souei's head was cut off and the Seiryuuto sprouted from his chest.

"Ah, this kind of thing is troublesome. It's good for killing these clever bastards, but it's not very interesting because the game is decided in an instant."

Needless to say, the voice belonged to Gardner, who was supposed to be dead.

The body was still lying there, but Gardner was still standing. The reason for this was a special ability Gardner had acquired. Ultimate Enchantment 'Alternative', 'Parallel Existence' was the power that Gardner had been lent by Rudra.

Unlike Velgrynd, who had an enormous amount of magicules, Gardner was a Saint level of ordinary. Although he was comparable to an awakened demon lord, he was not capable of creating multiple 'Split Bodies'. He could only create one, but it was enough.

No matter how cunning the opponent was, as long as it was the main body, they would not be able to see that it was a fake. Gardner's plan was to lure others into a false sense of security by using one of them as a decoy and attacking with the main body.

It was a strategy for victory, but Gardner was not satisfied with it. This is because Gardner enjoyed tormenting people who begged for their lives. With this method, he killed his enemies before they even had a chance to beg for their lives.

"Hey, are you alive? I don't think so."

Despite his complaint, Gardner had not forgotten his role. He had to make sure that anyone who entered the gate was killed, and he had to ensure that Souei was dead.

Then Gardner heard a cold voice saying, "I knew it."

After being decapitated and stabbed through the heart, Souei's body had dissipated into a black mist.

"Oh no!" Gardner shouted, but it was already too late to notice now.

If he hadn't lost his cool with Souei's plan, he might have realized that it was a Clone. But that was a matter of "if", and there was no point in discussing it now. Gardner's failure would only lead to consequences.

"If you wanted to use yourself as bait, a 'Clone' would be enough. It seems that that power was wasted on you." Souei's voice echoed coldly.

His point was so accurate that it cut Gardner to the heart. In fact, Gardner had met Velgrynd before. When he had just become a Saint, he had learned that the Marshal was a beautiful woman, and had gotten carried away with the idea that he could challenge here. As a result, he was defeated by a playful 'Split Body' in front of the elegantly seated Velgrynd.

At that time, it was Velgrynd's power that he longed for and craved from the bottom of his heart. Gardner's favorite sword, the Seiryuuto, was also a gift from Velgrynd. Souei was not blind to this. Gardner had been dancing on Souei's palm from the beginning.

"Damn it!" Gardner screamed.

The absolute situation had shaken him to the core. If one doubted their own abilities, the more ultimate one's power is, the more it would affect them. There was no way Souei wouldn't make a move targeting that.

"If you're convinced, then you're dead!"

With that, Souei was about to activate the Unique Skill 'Shadow Striker'. In that moment, Gardner played his final hand.

"Uoooh waaa-raaa!! Then what about this, how about this? All of them are my body, and even if I'll die, I'll take down you with me."

Multiple 'Split Bodies' attacked at once. All of them were the main body and defeating any one of them was pointless. It was the ultimate attack using 'Parallel Existence', which burned away at Gardner's life. It happened in less time than it took to blink. Therefore, it was difficult for Souei, who was aiming for a 'Shadow Striker' attack, to avoid it.

The greatest weakness of the 'Clone' used by Souei was that it could activate his Unique Skill except for the main body. Even Souei, who could control multiple 'Clones' at the same time, had not been able to overcome this weakness. This was the difference between a 'Clone' and a 'Split Body', so it was only natural.

If the main body is nearby, it can be made to look as if it is activating, but there will be a time delay. It would only be a gap against a superior opponent, so it had to be the main body that would deal the final blow.

"Kuh!!"

Souei thought to himself that he had let his guard down. It was common knowledge that the moment of stabbing was the most dangerous, and that one should not let one's guard down. For Souei, it was a blush-inducing blunder to fall into a crisis while knowing this.

*Forgive me, Rimuru-sama! I will definitely survive, and I will make up for this later.*

Souei tried to prepare for Gardner's final attack. Since he was not allowed to die, he had to survive.

But then:

![break]

<<I will not allow it. So, Souei, I will give you the power too.>>

![break]

Souei thought he heard a strange voice.

*Th-This voice is---No, no!!*

Instantly, he understood.

This voice must not be pursued or considered in any way.

Although it was unbecoming of a person in charge of the information department, Souei immediately decided as such.

![break]

<<So be it. The name of the power I give you is--->>

![break]

As if it were an innate power, Souei understood that power. And at the same time, in a field of consciousness that had been stretched a million times, he realized that his 'Clone' had been transformed into a 'Split Body'.

This meant that Souei had also acquired 'Parallel Existence'.

"Hahahahaha! I'm dying, but this is the end of him too. He deserves it---"

"Is that the end of your final will?"

"How---how is that possible?! This is definitely your body---"

"That's right. And this is just my body too. If you understand, then die."

"Damn it!!"

This time, Gardner had nothing left.

"Thousand Hands Shadow Kill."

Souei's shadow stretched out and became a thousand arms to capture Gardner. This was the effect of the Eye of the Moon, one of the powers of the Ultimate Gift 'Moon King Tsukuyomi' that Souei had just acquired. The ability to manipulate shadows at will was a perfect match for Souei.

Through the shadows, he could investigate the state of the world. And he could 'move' wherever there is a shadow. By combining this with Parallel Existence, it was possible to create multiple arms and attack from the shadows.

With his body bound, Gardner cried out in anguish.

"You can be proud of your victory. In any case, Velgrynd-sama and Granit-sama will take you down---" His words died out before he could finish them.

Gardner's life was cut short by Souei's 'Insta-kill'.

"Velgrynd-sama has been defeated by Rimuru-sama. And Granit is headed for Benimaru, who is stronger than me. Perhaps the same as me---ah, that's no longer any of your business."

Souei left those words and let Gardner disappear into the darkness.

